Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2315
Excise tax; first purchaser; records; reports; forms; remittance.

(1) The first purchaser, at the time of settlement with a grower, shall deduct the wheat excise tax as provided in section 2-2311 and shall maintain a record of the excise tax for each purchase of wheat on the grain settlement form or check stub showing payment to the grower for each purchase.

(2) The first purchaser shall also maintain a record of all settlements in which an excise tax was not deducted from the payment to the grower.

(3) Such records maintained by the first purchaser shall provide the following information: (a) Name and address of the grower and seller; (b) the date of the purchase; (c) the number of bushels of wheat sold; (d) the net market value of the wheat sold; and (e) the amount of wheat excise tax collected on each purchase. Such records shall be open for inspection and audit by authorized representatives of the board during normal business hours observed by the purchaser.

(4) The first purchaser shall file with the board by the last day of each January, April, July, and October on forms prescribed by the board, a statement of the number of bushels of wheat purchased in Nebraska. Such statement shall include the number of bushels of wheat for which the first purchaser collected the excise tax. At the time the statement is filed, the purchaser shall pay and remit to the board the tax as provided for in section 2-2311.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 15, p. 63;

Laws 1959, c. 8, § 2, p. 106;

Laws 1965, c. 16, § 1, p. 148;

Laws 1969, c. 21, § 3, p. 195;

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 31;

Laws 2022, LB805, § 6.
July 21, 2022